Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Portland State University is designated and shall be known as Oregon’s Ur-
ban Research University.
Enrolled House Bill 2556 (HB 2556-INTRO) Page 2
Passed by House February 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 22, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2556 (HB 2556-INTRO) Page 3